apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="djús__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inum</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sins</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vínf/öng__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>öng</l>       <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngin</l>     <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öng</l>       <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngin</l>     <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngum</l>     <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngunum</l>   <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anga</l>      <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anganna</l>   <r>öng<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hársv/örður__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>örður</l>     <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örðurinn</l>  <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örð</l>       <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örðinn</l>    <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>erði</l>      <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>erðinum</l>   <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arðar</l>     <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arðarins</l>  <r>örður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pásk/ar__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arnir</l>     <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anna</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="málning__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>una</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unni</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arinnar</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vínberjal/ögur__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>ögur</l>      <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögurinn</l>   <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ög</l>        <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öginn</l>     <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>egi</l>       <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eginum</l>    <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agar</l>      <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agarins</l>   <r>ögur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="syk/ur__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urinn</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urinn</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ri</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>rinum</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urs</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ursins</l>    <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gleraug/u__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nanna</l>     <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="málning">         <i>málning</i><par n="málning__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="persónubeyging">  <i>persónubeyging</i><par n="málning__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="krýning">         <i>krýning</i><par n="málning__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sólgleraugu">     <i>sólgleraug</i><par n="gleraug/u__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="djús">            <i>djús</i><par n="djús__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="samlagning">      <i>samlagning</i><par n="málning__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="páskar">          <i>pásk</i><par n="pásk/ar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="feðgar">          <i>feðg</i><par n="pásk/ar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hársvörður">      <i>hársv</i><par n="hársv/örður__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sykur">           <i>syk</i><par n="syk/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vínberjalögur">   <i>vínberjal</i><par n="vínberjal/ögur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="töfrar">          <i>töfr</i><par n="pásk/ar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fótsnyrting">     <i>fótsnyrting</i><par n="málning__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gleraugu">        <i>gleraug</i><par n="gleraug/u__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="handsnyrting">    <i>handsnyrting</i><par n="málning__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vínföng">         <i>vínf</i><par n="vínf/öng__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="marsering">       <i>marsering</i><par n="málning__n_f"/></e>
